lib/dict/lv_LV.aff
SFX ( Y 184
SFX (   t   ams      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   ama      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amâ      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amai     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amais    [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajâ    [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajai   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajam   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajâm   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajâs   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajiem  [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amajos   [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amam     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amâm     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amas     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amâs     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   ami      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amie     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amiem    [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amo      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amos     [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amu      [^âçî]t
SFX (   t   amus     [^âçî]t
SFX (   ît   âms     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âma     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmam    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmu     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmâ     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmas    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmai    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmi     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmiem   [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmus    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmos    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmâm    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmâs    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmais   [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajam  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmo     [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajâ   [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajai  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmie    [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajiem [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajos  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajâm  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   ît   âmajâs  [^cz][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâms     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâma     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmam    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmu     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmâ     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmas    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmai    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmi     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmiem   [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmus    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmos    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmâm    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmâs    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmais   [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajam  [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmo     [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajâ   [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajai  [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmie    [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajiem [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajos  [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajâm  [c][î]t
SFX (   cît  kâmajâs  [c][î]t
SFX (   ît   âms     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âma     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmam    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmu     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmâ     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmas    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmai    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmi     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmiem   [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmus    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmos    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmâm    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmâs    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmais   [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajam  [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmo     [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajâ   [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajai  [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmie    [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajiem [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajos  [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajâm  [^d]zît
SFX (   ît   âmajâs  [^d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâms     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâma     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmam    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmu     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmâ     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmas    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmai    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmi     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmiem   [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmus    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmos    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmâm    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmâs    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmais   [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajam  [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmo     [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajâ   [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajai  [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmie    [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajiem [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajos  [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajâm  [d]zît
SFX (   dzît  gâmajâs  [d]zît
SFX (   çt   ams      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   ama      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amâ      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amai     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amais    [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajâ    [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajai   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajam   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajâm   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajâs   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajiem  [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amajos   [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amam     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amâm     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amas     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amâs     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   ami      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amie     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amiem    [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amo      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amos     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amu      [^t][ç]t
SFX (   çt   amus     [^t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tams    [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tama      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamâ      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamai     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamais    [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajâ    [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajai   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajam   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajâm   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajâs   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajiem  [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamajos   [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamam     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamâm     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamas     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamâs     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tami      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamie     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamiem    [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamo      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamos     [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamu      [t][ç]t
SFX (   tçt   tamus     [t][ç]t
SFX (   t   ms      [â]t
SFX (   t   ma      [â]t
SFX (   t   mam     [â]t
SFX (   t   mu      [â]t
SFX (   t   mâ      [â]t
SFX (   t   mas     [â]t
SFX (   t   mai     [â]t
SFX (   t   mi      [â]t
SFX (   t   miem    [â]t
SFX (   t   mus     [â]t
SFX (   t   mos     [â]t
SFX (   t   mâm     [â]t
SFX (   t   mâs     [â]t
SFX (   t   mais    [â]t
SFX (   t   majam   [â]t
SFX (   t   mo      [â]t
SFX (   t   majâ    [â]t
SFX (   t   majai   [â]t
SFX (   t   mie     [â]t
SFX (   t   majiem  [â]t
SFX (   t   majos   [â]t
SFX (   t   majâm   [â]t
SFX (   t   majâs   [â]t

SFX n Y 23
SFX n   ît   âms      [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âma      [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmam     [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmu      [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmâ      [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmas     [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmai     [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmi      [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmiem    [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmus     [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmos     [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmâm     [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmâs     [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmais    [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmajam   [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmo      [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmajâ    [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmajai   [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmie     [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmajiem  [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmajos   [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmajâm   [c]ît
SFX n   ît   âmajâs   [c]ît

SFX r Y 23
SFX r   ît   oða      [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðâ      [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðai     [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðais    [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðajâ    [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðajai   [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðajam   [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðajâm   [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðajâs   [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðajiem  [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðajos   [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðam     [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðâm     [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðas     [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðâs     [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oði      [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðie     [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðiem    [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðo      [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðos     [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðs      [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðu      [c]ît
SFX r   ît   oðus     [c]ît

SFX ^ Y 23
SFX ^   t   stoðs     t
SFX ^   t   stoða     t
SFX ^   t   stoðam    t
SFX ^   t   stoðu     t
SFX ^   t   stoðâ     t
SFX ^   t   stoðas    t
SFX ^   t   stoðai    t
SFX ^   t   stoði     t
SFX ^   t   stoðiem   t
SFX ^   t   stoðus    t
SFX ^   t   stoðos    t
SFX ^   t   stoðâm    t
SFX ^   t   stoðâs    t
SFX ^   t   stoðais   t
SFX ^   t   stoðajam  t
SFX ^   t   stoðo     t
SFX ^   t   stoðajâ   t
SFX ^   t   stoðajai  t
SFX ^   t   stoðie    t
SFX ^   t   stoðajiem t
SFX ^   t   stoðajos  t
SFX ^   t   stoðajâm  t
SFX ^   t   stoðajâs  t

SFX $ Y 23
SFX $   t   joðs     t
SFX $   t   joða     t
SFX $   t   joðam    t
SFX $   t   joðu     t
SFX $   t   joðâ     t
SFX $   t   joðas    t
SFX $   t   joðai    t
SFX $   t   joði     t
SFX $   t   joðiem   t
SFX $   t   joðus    t
SFX $   t   joðos    t
SFX $   t   joðâm    t
SFX $   t   joðâs    t
SFX $   t   joðais   t
SFX $   t   joðajam  t
SFX $   t   joðo     t
SFX $   t   joðajâ   t
SFX $   t   joðajai  t
SFX $   t   joðie    t
SFX $   t   joðajiem t
SFX $   t   joðajos  t
SFX $   t   joðajâm  t
SFX $   t   joðajâs  t
