lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
aizkoíetçt/+Jb$)I1BHM
aizkûpinât/+(cb]JhdIBCM{1g[}
aizlîkt/9+^7JIMZB4
aizmîcît/c+BI1rd[b]JgM{C
aizsnaikstît/I+BMbh(JC1
aizstât/+)GbgI6$d{B1[]p
aiztûkt/+I9B^M7ZJ4
aizşvadzinât/+b(JIB1hCM
apaulekğot/1BI+)Jb$HM
apgrût/I+M97B^ZJ4
apkarinât/c(+dhCJbIMBg[]}1{
apkâtot/+G)b{$IHgJBdM1[p]
apmurcît/+rbMJIBC1
apmâcît/+I&rBd*c{bgM1J[C]
apmîcît/+IBrbMJ1C
appilçt/+MJ(hIBbC1
apreibt/+MI^ZBe4J7
apsarmot/+$IB1b)MHJ
apslîkt/+97^JZIBM4
apsmidzinât/Mh(bC+I1BJ
apstulbt/^+
aptûkt/Z7+^9MJ4BI
apvârtît/I+hg&b*c(1BJ]dC{[M
apvçsmot/J+b$)BIHM1
apòurcît/+rMIb1JB*&C
atbubinât/h+b(JCBIM1
atdzesçt/HIdB{bGg)J$+[1pM]
atgult/+dBR^JZeMI7[5]
atklabinât/+h(BbIJMC1
atmirgot/I+M$bBJ)H1
atmirt/e+ZI^JMB74
atplandçt/+1Bb(JMCIh
atslâbt/^+Z7eMBIJ4
atspirdzinât/+h&b{IB(*gcM1J][Cd}
atsçrot/+IdJ$bG{BHg[)p]1M
attrûkt/+IZ79^B4MJ
atvçsinât/h+(bI1BCJM
audzinât/b+MdhJ]g{&*cI(1BC[}
bakelizçt/1HB)Mb$IJ+
debitçt/1+$IB)bHJM
dipinât/M+Jh(bIB1C
duïíot/+b{I$[)GJBdHgM]p1
dzimt/+eIJ^B4Z7M
galvot/b)IB1H$+JM
guldzçt/+BIb(1hJMC
ieceïot/+J$I)bMHB1
iedzimt/BJI4^+e7ZM
ieglûnçt/+(MBhCI1Jb
iekrâpt/BeI$J46M)
iekûpinât/+bhd[{JgBI(c1}]CM
ielîgt/+9^ZJBI4M
iemurcît/[crI+1B]Jbdg{MC
iemâcît/+IbdB1r&*Jc{gM[C]
iemîcît/+IdbcBrJ{gM1[C]
ieradinât/+1(BIhCbJM
ierullçt/d+I1B)${bGMpJgH[]
ierûgt/B+^9IZM4J
iesprâgt/I+B^ZJ9M4
iespïaudît/I+grcb(BdJ]C[1{M
iesvaidît/+dh{cbBIJ[(g1]MC
ievalcçt/+IJ)1B$HbM
ieèabçt/+JMhC(bBI1
ieïumt/+ZeB7I^JM4
ieòurcît/+IBb1g{J]rdc[MC
intervçt/bIM$+)B1g]JpGHd[{
izbiedinât/(+bhIBMJ1C
izgaiòât/b+$Mg)HJ]GIB1d{[p
izirdinât/+bIB(1gcdh}]JCM{[
izirt/+ZedJIM[TB47^]
izlâdçt/+b)H*h{(cGp$&I[dgJ]MB}C1
izmurcît/c+J[rgb1BIdM{C]
izmâcît/+bBdrIJc{gM1[C]
izmîcît/cBd+bIrJ{gM[1C]
iznîkt/+4BI^97ZJM
izpurkğíinât/c+([hIb1g{CMJBd}]
izriòíot/+I)b{gMB1dHJ[$pG]
izslîkt/7B^+I9MZ4J
izurbt/+)e[6$TIBdp4]
izvalbît/ch+[dI({bgBJ1M]C
izòurcît/+bcBIJd1g{[]rMC
izşulgt/9^+IZBMJ4
kaitçt/J+)b(h$p[cICGM]dHg{B1}
kodît/+hgb(IBcd]J1{[CM
korodçt/+I$BbHJM1
lît/J+ZIBM^75
maitât/b+J${p)B[gIGMdH]1
murcît/+[dIgbrMcBJ]{1C
mâcît/gb&I*+Bdcr{M1J][C
mîcît/gbI+Bdcr{MJ][1C
neieknâbt/e)$B
nobûkğíçt/+h(J1BIbCM
nodiskutçt/)]J+$HgbIdBMG1{p[
nogurt/+MZ^eIJB74
noknâbt/+Be)6I$4
nokutinât/B+Ih(CbJ1M
nomurcît/+JgbIBcrd[]{M1C
nomâcît/+crBdIb{gM1J[C]
nomîcît/cBdrIb+{gMJ[1C]
nonirt/+^eIZJB4M7
nooğòât/+{bgJdB$[I)HGp1M]
nosarkt/9Z+^JIBM4
nosavrupinât/cgI+Jb{d(Bh}CM1][
noslçpot/[+$GIJd1Bb)M{gpH]
nostrçgt/Z^+94IMJ
novaldît/(+hbgcIJBMd[{1]C
novibrçt/+IJBb$1MH)
noïimt/+e^IB7ZM4J
noòurcît/+J]1gIMbr{[BdcC
okulçt/)+H$Ib1MBJ
pabikstît/+Jb{I(cB1Mhd]g[C
pagrût/7+^IMZ49JB
pagumdît/+(IB[rgbcdJ]{M1C
paknakstît/+bIM1hJ(BC
palîgot/I+d${[GbJB1)pHg]M
palît/+Z^JIBM57
pamurcît/c+{g1IBrJdb][MC
pamâcît/+r1BIdbcJ{gM[C]
pamîcît/+rgcBdIbJ{M1[C]
papîkstinât/+1(IbJhMBC
papîkt/^+B9Z4JIM7
pasilt/e+Z^JIB47M
paspirgt/^BM9+J4I
pasviedrçt/$b+Bd[)JGIp{Mg1]H
patincinât/hJ+bc(gIB1[d{M}C]
patûkt/+JZ79IM^4B
pağòakstinât/+BIh(1JbMC
paòurcît/+gIb1{cJBrdM[C]
piebirt/+eI7BZJM^4
piedragât/+$gGIBH[J{)bM1pd]
pieguldît/+rcb(IdB{1g[MJ]C
pielîkt/9I^B+JZ7M4
piemâcît/b+gcrBCIJ{1d[]M
piemîcît/bBdr+gCI1cJ{[]M
pieprasît/Bd&*+g(M]Jhcb[I1{C
pierimt/^+IeZBdM4T7R[J]
piestabulçt/+gId)B1J$pHG{b[]M
piestingt/+^IZM9B4J
pieşulgt/4B^I+ZJ9M
plağinât/{bc+h}B(IgCdJ[1M]
pârautomatizçt/I+$bBHJ1)M
pârgût/+^9JZIB47M
pârkodît/I+hMb(CBJ1
pârmodificçt/BJ+b)IH$1M
pârmurcît/bcI+JMrCB[g1d]{
pârmâcît/+r[gcIb{JdMB1]C
pârmîcît/+r[gIBc1b{JdMC]
pârstrâdinât/+(MgBI]JbhC{}1cd[
pârsvilt/^+7I4BZeJM
pârvçtît/+(H$JM)IBb1
pâròurcît/c+bIMrJBd1gC[{]
râva/Smr
rîbçt/bB+(IJhMC1
sadiedelçt/)+$bI1JBMH
sadzît/B7I+Z^M5J
sagumdît/+(IB[rgbcdJ]{M1C
sakratît/+dBIJ{h]c(gCbM[1
samirkt/+B^9JIZ4M
samurcît/+Jc1IBdb{gr[]MC
samâcît/+1IBdb]Jrg[c{MC
samîcît/cBd+b]JgrI[{M1C
sapelnît/I(+Bd)bGg1[$J]MH{p
sarosinât/I+b[g(CchJdB]1{}M
saskâbt/ZIe+^B74MJ
savedinât/+cI(]Jbd[hBgC1{M}
savizuïot/J$+bBH)MI1
saïumt/+^I4B7eZJM
saòurcît/+r*gIJbB1{dc&][MC
snaikstît/h+(cg1MbIBJd{C[]
stulbt/eZ+^IB74MJ
sunît/+gG)b$IJdM[{HB]p1
uzbârstît/+bcB({hIdJ]g[M1C
uzknâbt/+$)eIB64
uzlîkt/+7B9^IZ4JM
uzmîcît/cBd+Irb{gMJ][1C
uzplaiksnît/hb+IcgdM{B([1J]C
uztransportçt/$1b+HI)BMJ
uzturçt/+IBgbJ]h(d*&Cc1M{[}
uzòurcît/+brIB1g{dJcM[C]
vârgt/+^9ZBIMJ4
vçstît/bI)[+$J]BG(dg{M1Hp
íepçt/bB$IHgJ)+{MdG1[p]
òurcît/Ir[b+M1g{dJBc]C
